Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
UNIFORM PROBATE CODE TABLE

The following table shows the Uniform Probate Code (UPC) (as last amended or revised in 2010) derivation of the statutes that comprise the Alaska version of the UPC.

AS UPC 13.06.005 1-101 13.06.010 1-102 13.06.015 1-103 13.06.020 1-104 13.06.025 1-105 13.06.030 1-106 13.06.035 1-107 13.06.040 1-108 13.06.050 1-201 13.06.060 1-301 13.06.065 1-302 13.06.068 none 13.06.070 1-303 13.06.080 1-305 13.06.085 1-306 13.06.090 1-307 13.06.100 1-310 13.06.110 1-401 13.06.115 1-402 13.06.120 1-403 13.12.101 2-101 13.12.102 2-102 13.12.103 2-103 13.12.104 2-104 13.12.105 2-105 13.12.106 2-106 13.12.107 2-107 13.12.108 2-104 13.12.109 2-109 13.12.110 2-110 13.12.111 2-111 13.12.113 2-113 13.12.114 2-117, 2-118 13.12.201 2-201 13.12.202 2-202 13.12.203 2-203 13.12.204 2-204 13.12.205 2-205 13.12.206 2-206 13.12.207 2-207 13.12.208 2-208 13.12.209 2-209 13.12.210 2-210 13.12.211 2-211 13.12.212 2-212 13.12.213 2-213 13.12.214 2-214 13.12.301 2-301 13.12.302 2-302 13.12.401 2-401 13.12.402 2-402 13.12.403 2-403 13.12.404 2-404 13.12.405 2-405 13.12.501 2-501 13.12.502 2-502 13.12.504 2-504 13.12.505 2-505 13.12.506 2-506 13.12.507 2-507 13.12.508 2-508 13.12.509 2-509 13.12.510 2-510 13.12.511 2-511 13.12.512 2-512 13.12.513 2-513 13.12.514 2-514 13.12.515 2-515 13.12.516 2-516 13.12.517 2-517 13.12.530 none 13.12.535 none 13.12.540 none 13.12.545 none 13.12.550 none 13.12.555 none 13.12.560 none 13.12.565 none 13.12.570 none 13.12.575 none 13.12.580 none 13.12.585 none 13.12.590 none 13.12.601 2-601 13.12.602 2-602 13.12.603 2-603 13.12.604 2-604 13.12.605 2-605 13.12.606 2-606 13.12.607 2-607 13.12.608 2-608 13.12.609 2-609 13.12.701 2-701 13.12.702 2-702 13.12.703 2-703 13.12.704 2-704 13.12.705 2-705 13.12.706 2-706 13.12.707 2-707 13.12.708 2-708 13.12.709 2-709 13.12.710 2-710 13.12.711 2-711 13.12.712 none 13.12.720 none 13.12.801 2-801 13.12.802 2-802 13.12.803 2-803 13.12.804 2-804 13.12.907 2-907 13.12.912 2-1002 13.12.913 2-1003 13.12.914 2-1004 13.12.915 2-1005 13.12.916 2-1006 13.12.917 2-1007 13.12.918 2-1008 13.12.919 2-1009 13.12.920 2-1010 13.12.921 2-1001 13.16.005 3-101 13.16.010 3-102 13.16.015 3-103 13.16.020 3-104 13.16.025 3-105 13.16.030 3-106 13.16.035 3-107 13.16.040 3-108 13.16.045 3-109 13.16.055 3-201 13.16.060 3-202 13.16.065 3-203 13.16.070 3-204 13.16.080 3-301 13.16.085 3-302 13.16.090 3-303 13.16.095 3-304 13.16.100 3-305 13.16.105 3-306 13.16.110 3-307 13.16.115 3-308 13.16.120 3-309 13.16.125 3-310 13.16.130 3-311 13.16.140 3-401 13.16.145 3-402 13.16.150 3-403 13.16.155 3-404 13.16.160 3-405 13.16.165 3-406 13.16.170 3-407 13.16.175 3-408 13.16.180 3-409 13.16.185 3-410 13.16.190 3-411 13.16.195 3-412 13.16.200 3-413 13.16.205 3-414 13.16.215 3-501 13.16.220 3-502 13.16.225 3-503 13.16.230 3-504 13.16.235 3-505 13.16.245 3-601 13.16.250 3-602 13.16.255 3-603 13.16.260 3-604 13.16.265 3-605 13.16.270 3-606 13.16.275 3-607 13.16.280 3-608 13.16.285 3-609 13.16.290 3-610 13.16.295 3-611 13.16.300 3-612 13.16.305 3-613 13.16.310 3-614 13.16.315 3-615 13.16.320 3-616 13.16.325 3-617 13.16.330 3-618 13.16.340 3-701 13.16.345 3-702 13.16.350 3-703 13.16.355 3-704 13.16.360 3-705 13.16.365 3-706 13.16.370 3-707 13.16.375 3-708 13.16.380 3-709 13.16.381 none 13.16.385 3-710 13.16.390 3-711 13.16.395 3-712 13.16.400 3-713 13.16.405 3-714 13.16.410 3-715 13.16.415 3-716 13.16.420 3-717 13.16.425 3-718 13.16.430 3-719 13.16.435 3-720 13.16.440 3-721 13.16.450 3-801 13.16.455 3-802 13.16.460 3-803 13.16.465 3-804 13.16.470 3-805 13.16.475 3-806 13.16.480 3-807 13.16.485 3-808 13.16.490 3-809 13.16.495 3-810 13.16.500 3-811 13.16.505 3-812 13.16.510 3-813 13.16.515 3-814 13.16.520 3-815 13.16.525 3-816 13.16.530 none 13.16.535 3-901 13.16.540 3-902 13.16.545 3-903 13.16.550 3-904 13.16.555 3-905 13.16.560 3-906 13.16.565 3-907 13.16.570 3-908 13.16.575 3-909 13.16.580 3-910 13.16.585 3-911 13.16.590 3-912 13.16.595 3-913 13.16.600 3-914 13.16.605 3-915 13.16.610 none 13.16.620 3-1001 13.16.625 3-1002 13.16.630 3-1003 13.16.635 3-1004 13.16.640 3-1005 13.16.645 3-1006 13.16.650 3-1007 13.16.655 3-1008 13.16.665 3-1101 13.16.670 3-1102 13.16.680 3-1201 13.16.685 3-1202 13.16.690 3-1203 13.16.695 3-1204 13.16.700 none 13.16.705 none 13.21.005 4-101 13.21.010 none 13.21.015 4-201 13.21.020 4-202 13.21.025 4-203 13.21.030 4-204 13.21.035 4-205 13.21.040 4-206 13.21.045 4-207 13.21.055 4-301 13.21.060 4-302 13.21.065 4-303 13.21.075 4-401 13.26.001 none 13.26.005 5-102 13.26.010 5-106 13.26.021 5-307, 5-407 13.26.031 5-104 13.26.041 5-115 13.26.051 5-105 13.26.066 5-105 13.26.101 5-201 13.26.121 5-202 13.26.126 5-203 13.26.132 5-204 13.26.137 5-108 13.26.143 5-206 13.26.147 5-207 13.26.153 none 13.26.157 none 13.26.162 5-110, 5-208 13.26.167 5-207, 5-208 13.26.171 5-210 13.26.181 5-211 13.26.186 5-212 13.26.201 none 13.26.211 5-302, 5-303 13.26.216 5-108 13.26.221 5-304 13.26.226 5-305 13.26.231 5-305 13.26.236 5-305 13.26.241 5-306, 5-307 13.26.246 none 13.26.251 5-308 13.26.256 none 13.26.261 none 13.26.266 5-311 13.26.271 5-317 13.26.276 5-317 13.26.281 5-318 13.26.286 5-318 13.26.291 none 13.26.296 5-309 13.26.301 5-313 13.26.306 none 13.26.311 5-310 13.26.316 5-314, 5-315 13.26.401 5-401 13.26.406 5-402 13.26.411 none 13.26.415 5-403 13.26.420 5-404 13.26.425 5-113 13.26.430 5-408 13.26.435 5-409 13.26.440 5-412 13.26.445 none 13.26.450 none 13.26.455 none 13.26.460 none 13.26.465 5-413 13.26.470 5-415 13.26.475 5-416 13.26.480 5-111 13.26.485 5-417 13.26.490 none 13.26.495 5-416 13.26.500 5-418 13.26.505 5-419 13.26.510 5-420 13.26.515 none 13.26.520 5-421 13.26.525 5-421 13.26.530 5-423 13.26.535 5-424 13.26.540 5-425 13.26.545 5-427 13.26.550 5-425 13.26.555 none 13.26.560 5-429 13.26.565 5-430 13.26.570 5-431 13.26.575 none 13.26.580 none 13.26.595 none 13.26.600 5B-105 13.26.605 5B-113, 5B-117 13.26.610 5B-114 13.26.615 5B-119, 5B-120 13.26.620 5B-110, 5B-118 13.26.625 5B-110 13.26.630 none 13.26.635 5B-116 13.26.640 5B-123 13.26.645 5B-301, 5B-201 13.26.650 none 13.26.655 none 13.26.660 5B-109 13.26.665 5B-204, 5B-205, 5B-206, 5B-207, 5B-208, 5B-209, 5B-210, 5B-211, 5B-212, 5B-213, 5B-214, 5B-215, 5B-216, 5B-217 13.26.670 none 13.26.675 5B-104 13.26.680 5B-119 13.26.695 5B-102 13.26.700 none 13.26.710 none 13.26.720 none 13.26.730 none 13.26.740 none 13.26.750 none 13.27.010 5A-103 13.27.020 5A-104 13.27.030 5A-105 13.27.040 5A-106 13.27.100 5A-202 13.27.110 5A-203 13.27.120 5A-204 13.27.130 5A-205 13.27.140 5A-206 13.27.150 5A-207 13.27.160 5A-208 13.27.170 5A-209 13.27.180 5A-201 13.27.200 5A-301 13.27.210 5A-302 13.27.300 5A-401 13.27.310 5A-402 13.27.320 5A-403 13.27.400 none 13.27.410 none 13.27.420 none 13.27.490 5A-102 13.27.495 5A-101 13.33.101 6-101, 6-102 13.33.201 6-201 13.33.202 6-202 13.33.203 6-203 13.33.204 6-204 13.33.205 6-205 13.33.206 6-206 13.33.211 6-211 13.33.212 6-212 13.33.213 6-213 13.33.214 6-214 13.33.215 6-102 13.33.216 6-216 13.33.221 6-221 13.33.222 6-222 13.33.223 6-223 13.33.224 6-224 13.33.225 6-225 13.33.226 6-226 13.33.227 6-227 13.33.301 6-301 13.33.302 6-302 13.33.303 6-303 13.33.304 6-304 13.33.305 6-305 13.33.306 6-306 13.33.307 6-307 13.33.308 6-308 13.33.309 6-309 13.33.310 6-310

Click to view

Editor’s notes. —

Although AS 13.36 is part of the Alaska Uniform Probate Code, AS 13.36 (Trust Administration) is not included in this table because these trust provisions were based on Article VII of the UPC and Article VII was withdrawn from the UPC in 2010 due to the widespread enactment of the Uniform Trust Code.

Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1985 to remove personal pronouns pursuant to § 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982 and in 1985, 1998, 2010, and 2018 to make other, minor word changes.